Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Power Projects.

Sec. 44.83.380.
Program established. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.382.
Power development fund established.

A power development fund is established in the Alaska Energy Authority to carry out the purposes of former AS

44.83.380

—

44.83.425

.

The fund includes money appropriated to it by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 27 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 13 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.83.410

. Renumbered in 1981.

In 1989, the revisor of statutes substituted “Alaska Energy Authority” for “Alaska Power Authority” in subsection (a) in accordance with E.O. 75, § 8 (1989).

Sec. 44.83.384.
Use of fund balance.

The fund may be used by the authority to provide money for

the defeasance of bonds, or the payment of debt service on loans for or on an issue of bonds sold in connection with a power project constructed or acquired before August 11, 1993;

the cost of operating and maintaining power projects constructed or acquired before August 11, 1993; and

debt service on power projects constructed or acquired before August 11, 1993.

[Repealed § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 12 ch 133 SLA 1982; am §§ 14, 15 ch 89 SLA 1983; am §§ 14, 28 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.83.420

. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 44.83.386.
Investment of fund.

The authority shall invest the money in the fund in the manner provided in AS

37.10.070

,

37.10.071

, and

37.10.075

. The authority may withdraw money from the fund only after costs have been incurred or amounts in the fund have been otherwise obligated under contracts for the acquisition and construction of a project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 16 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 31 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 36 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.83.430. Renumbered in 1981.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 36, SLA 2004 (SB 337) amending this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 2179 - 2180.

Sec. 44.83.388.
Allotment to projects.

The authority shall maintain records of power project allocations from the fund for each power project

approved in accordance with former AS 44.83.185; and

for which an allocation is made from an appropriation made by the legislature without specifying an appropriation to a project.

Income earned from investment of money appropriated to the fund shall be deposited in the general fund and may be appropriated to the fund by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 15 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.83.440. Renumbered in 1981.

Secs. 44.83.390,
44.83.392.
Reappropriation of fund balance; lapse of excess appropriations. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.394.
Revenue requirements. [Repealed, § 27 ch 89 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 44.83.396.
Operation of power project.

A power project that was acquired or constructed under AS

44.83.080

(18) or as part of the former energy program for Alaska is owned, and shall be administered, by the authority.

When a power project has been acquired or constructed by the authority, the project may be operated for the authority under a contract or lease entered into by a qualified utility and the authority.

The authority shall enter into a contract or lease under reasonable terms and conditions to permit the applicant utility to operate the power project when the applicant utility is the only wholesale power customer to be served directly by the power project unless the authority determines a utility making application for a contract or lease to operate a power project is not a qualified utility or is not capable of operating that power project efficiently and in a manner that is consistent with national standards for the industry and with agreements with bondholders.

The authority shall adopt regulations to determine the manner of selecting a qualified utility to operate a power project under a contract or lease when there is more than one wholesale power customer to be served directly by the power project.

When the authority permits a power project to be operated by a qualified utility under a contract or lease, the authority shall

review and approve the annual budget for the operation and maintenance of the power project; and

assure that the project is being operated efficiently and in a manner that is consistent with national standards for the industry and agreements with bondholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1981; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 16 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 6 FSSLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.83.480. Renumbered in 1981.

Cross references. —

For authority to sell the four dam pool hydroelectric project, see sec. 15, ch. 60, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts and sec. 4, ch. 100, SLA 2004 in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For operation of projects, see 3 AAC 105, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 14, 2011, inserted “under AS

44.83.080

(18) or” in (a).

Sec. 44.83.398.
Sale of power from power project. [Repealed, § 13 ch 60 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 44.83.400.
Energy conservation. [Repealed, § 28 ch 18 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 44.83.410.
Appropriation for Railbelt energy development. [Repealed, § 317 ch 171 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 44.83.420.
Continuing appropriation for Bradley Lake hydroelectric project. [Repealed, § 318 ch 171 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 44.83.425.
Definitions.

In AS

44.83.382

—

44.83.425

,

“debt service” means the amounts covenanted with respect to, or pledged to pay, bonds under a trust agreement securing bonds;

“fund” means the power development fund established by AS

44.83.382

;

“qualified utility” means an electric utility or an electric operating entity established as an instrumentality of two or more electric utilities certified under AS 42.05 to serve all or part of a market area that is served or will be served by the power project, that the authority determines is capable of operating and maintaining the power project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1981; am § 24 ch 89 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 1985; am § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 22 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 58 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.83.510

. Renumbered in 1981. Paragraphs renumbered in 1993 when the repealed paragraphs were deleted.